Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-717
Meetings; quorum.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a majority of the members present in person shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of members.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 17, p. 208;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-817;

R.S.1943, § 70-717.